Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2378.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 244.45, is amended to read: 244.45 INELIGIBILITY FOR EARNED INCENTIVE RELEASE CREDIT. The following individuals are ineligible for earned incentive release credit: (1) those serving life sentences; (2) those given indeterminate sentences for crimes committed on or before April 30, 1980; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (3) those subject to good time under section 244.04 or similar lawsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (4) those serving sentences for: a crime that resulted in the death of a person; first or second degree criminal sexual conduct; a criminal sexual conduct crime involving a victim under 16 years of age; a crime involving child pornography or child exploitation; any crime of violence, as defined in section 624.712, in which the individual used or possessed a dangerous weapon; or any crime that carried a mandatory minimum sentence. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 244.46, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Applicability. This section does not apply to individuals: (1) serving life sentences; (2) given indeterminate sentences for crimes committed on or before April 30, 1980; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (3) subject to good time under section 244.04 or similar lawsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (4) those serving sentences for: a crime that resulted in the death of a person; first or second degree criminal sexual conduct; a criminal sexual conduct crime involving a victim under 16 years of age; a crime involving child pornography or child exploitation; any crime of violence, as defined in section 624.712, in which the individual used or possessed a dangerous weapon; or any crime that carried a mandatory minimum sentence. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end